Hawaii, session 2026, HB2382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $146,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fortieth representative district, as follows: 1.        East Kapolei Elementary, Ewa Beach, Oahu Plans, land acquisition, design, construction, equipment, and appurtenances for a new elementary school using standards based designs, modern educational specifications, design guides, construction specifications, standard technical drawings, and commissioning plans, for accelerated construction schedules and building maintainability. Design                                 $3,972,000 Construction                           $142,028,000 Total funding                     $146,000,000 SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $2,080,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fortieth representative district, as follows: 1.        Road improvements, Oahu A.  Plans and design, supplies, construction, and equipment for audible beaconing signals at Fort Weaver Road and Keaunui Drive traffic light intersections for disabled blind pedestrians. Total funding                     $810,000 B.  Plans and design, supplies, construction, and equipment for audible beaconing signals at Fort Weaver Road and Geiger Road traffic light intersections for disabled blind pedestrians. Total funding                     $1,270,000 SECTION 3.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital project set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital project set forth in section 2 shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________